District of Columbia statutes.
8-1813

Notice of violation.

(a)

The Mayor may issue a notice of violation to any person who violates a provision of this subchapter.

(b)

A notice of violation shall:

(1)

State the nature of the violation; and

(2)

Describe the procedures provided in this section.

(c)

A notice of violation shall be the summons and complaint for the purposes of this subchapter.

(d)

A person shall answer a notice of violation within 15 days by:

(1)

Depositing and forfeiting collateral in an amount established by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia; or

(2)

Depositing collateral in an amount established by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and requesting, through the issuing agency, a trial in Court.

(e)

The Mayor shall prescribe the form for the notice of violation and establish procedures for the administrative control of the notice of violation.

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 13, 26 DCR 765

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1013.
1973 Ed., § 6-2412.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority under Law 3-30, see Mayor’s Order 83-206, August 2, 1983.

Delegation of Authority